Washington statutes.
RCW 36.38.040

Vehicle parking charges tax—Parking facility at stadium and exhibition center—Use of revenues before and after issuance of bonds.

The legislative authority of a county that has created a public stadium authority to develop a stadium and exhibition center under RCW 36.102.050 may levy and fix a tax on any vehicle parking charges imposed at any parking facility that is part of a stadium and exhibition center, as defined in RCW 36.102.010. The tax shall be exclusive and shall preclude the city or town within which the stadium and exhibition center is located from imposing within its corporate limits a tax of the same or similar kind on any vehicle parking charges imposed at any parking facility that is part of a stadium and exhibition center. For the purposes of this section, "vehicle parking charges" means only the actual parking charges exclusive of taxes and service charges and the value of any other benefit conferred. The tax authorized under this section shall be at the rate of not more than ten percent. Revenues collected under this section shall be deposited in the stadium and exhibition center account under RCW 43.99N.060 until the bonds issued under RCW 43.99N.020 for the construction of the stadium and exhibition center are retired. After the bonds issued for the construction of the stadium and exhibition center are retired, the tax authorized under this section shall be used exclusively to fund repair, reequipping, and capital improvement of the stadium and exhibition center. The tax under this section may be levied upon the first use of any part of the stadium and exhibition center but shall not be collected at any facility already in operation as of July 17, 1997.

[ 1997 c 220 s 302 (Referendum Bill No. 48, approved June 17, 1997).]

NOTES:

Referendum—Other legislation limited—Legislator's personal intent not indicated—Reimbursements for election—Voters' pamphlet, election requirements—1997 c 220: See RCW 36.102.800 through 36.102.803.